Illinois, session 104th, HB1424.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Film Production Services Tax Credit Act of 52008 is amended by changing Section 10 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 16/10)7    Sec. 10. Definitions. As used in this Act: 8    "Accredited production" means: (i) for productions 9commencing before May 1, 2006, a film, video, or television 10production that has been certified by the Department in which 11the aggregate Illinois labor expenditures included in the cost 12of the production, in the period that ends 12 months after the 13time principal filming or taping of the production began, 14exceed $100,000 for productions of 30 minutes or longer, or 15$50,000 for productions of less than 30 minutes; and (ii) for 16productions commencing on or after May 1, 2006, a film, video, 17or television production that has been certified by the 18Department in which the Illinois production spending included 19in the cost of production in the period that ends 12 months 20after the time principal filming or taping of the production 21began exceeds $100,000 for productions of 30 minutes or longer 22or exceeds $50,000 for productions of less than 30 minutes. 23"Accredited production" does not include a production that:  HB1424- 2 -LRB104 05872 HLH 15903 b1        (1) is news, current events, or public programming, or 2    a program that includes weather or market reports; 3        (2) is a talk show produced for local or regional 4    markets; 5        (3) (blank); 6        (4) is a sports event or activity; 7        (5) is a gala presentation or awards show; 8        (6) is a finished production that solicits funds; 9        (7) is a production produced by a film production 10    company if records, as required by 18 U.S.C. 2257, are to 11    be maintained by that film production company with respect 12    to any performer portrayed in that single media or 13    multimedia program; or 14        (8) is a production produced primarily for industrial, 15    corporate, or institutional purposes. 16    "Accredited animated production" means an accredited 17production in which movement and characters' performances are 18created using a frame-by-frame technique and a significant 19number of major characters are animated. Motion capture by 20itself is not an animation technique. 21    "Accredited production certificate" means a certificate 22issued by the Department certifying that the production is an 23accredited production that meets the guidelines of this Act.24    "Applicant" means a taxpayer that is a film production 25company that is operating or has operated an accredited 26production located within the State of Illinois and that (i)   HB1424- 3 -LRB104 05872 HLH 15903 b1owns the copyright in the accredited production throughout the 2Illinois production period or (ii) has contracted directly 3with the owner of the copyright in the accredited production 4or a person acting on behalf of the owner to provide services 5for the production, where the owner of the copyright is not an 6eligible production corporation. 7    "Credit" means: 8        (1) for an accredited production approved by the 9    Department on or before January 1, 2005 and commencing 10    before May 1, 2006, the amount equal to 25% of the Illinois 11    labor expenditure approved by the Department. The 12    applicant is deemed to have paid, on its balance due day 13    for the year, an amount equal to 25% of its qualified 14    Illinois labor expenditure for the tax year. For Illinois 15    labor expenditures generated by the employment of 16    residents of geographic areas of high poverty or high 17    unemployment, as determined by the Department, in an 18    accredited production commencing before May 1, 2006 and 19    approved by the Department after January 1, 2005, the 20    applicant shall receive an enhanced credit of 10% in 21    addition to the 25% credit; and22        (2) for an accredited production commencing on or 23    after May 1, 2006 and before January 1, 2009, the amount 24    equal to:25            (i) 20% of the Illinois production spending for 26        the taxable year; plus  HB1424- 4 -LRB104 05872 HLH 15903 b1            (ii) 15% of the Illinois labor expenditures 2        generated by the employment of residents of geographic 3        areas of high poverty or high unemployment, as 4        determined by the Department; and5        (3) for an accredited production commencing on or 6    after January 1, 2009 and before January 1, 2026, the 7    amount equal to: 8            (i) 30% of the Illinois production spending for 9        the taxable year; plus 10            (ii) 15% of the Illinois labor expenditures 11        generated by the employment of residents of geographic 12        areas of high poverty or high unemployment, as 13        determined by the Department; and . 14        (4) for an accredited production commencing on or 15    after January 1, 2026, the amount equal to: 16            (i) 30% of the Illinois production spending for 17        the taxable year; plus 18            (ii) 15% of the Illinois labor expenditures 19        generated by the employment of residents of geographic 20        areas of high poverty or high unemployment, as 21        determined by the Department; plus 22            (iii) 30% of the Illinois labor expenditures 23        generated as a result of work performed in Illinois by 24        an actor who portrays, in the production, a woman 25        working in a STEM-related field. 26        For the purposes of calculating the additional credit   HB1424- 5 -LRB104 05872 HLH 15903 b1    under subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph (4): 2            (A) if the total production spending for the 3        production is $25,000,000 or less, then the wages of 4        each resident Illinois resident actor described in 5        that subparagraph (iii) and up to 2 eligible 6        non-resident actors described in that subparagraph 7        (iii) may be used to calculate the additional credit 8        under that subparagraph (iii); and 9            (B) if the total production spending for the 10        production is more than $25,000,000, then the wages of 11        each resident Illinois resident actor described in 12        that subparagraph (iii) and up to 4 eligible 13        non-resident actors described in that subparagraph 14        (iii) may be used to calculate the additional credit 15        under that subparagraph (iii). 16    "Department" means the Department of Commerce and Economic 17Opportunity.18    "Director" means the Director of Commerce and Economic 19Opportunity.20    "Illinois labor expenditure" means salary or wages paid to 21employees of the applicant for services on the accredited 22production.23    To qualify as an Illinois labor expenditure, the 24expenditure must be: 25        (1) Reasonable in the circumstances. 26        (2) Included in the federal income tax basis of the   HB1424- 6 -LRB104 05872 HLH 15903 b1    property. 2        (3) Incurred by the applicant for services on or after 3    January 1, 2004. 4        (4) Incurred for the production stages of the 5    accredited production, from the final script stage to the 6    end of the post-production stage. 7        (5) Limited to the first $25,000 of wages paid or 8    incurred to each employee of a production commencing 9    before May 1, 2006 and the first $100,000 of wages paid or 10    incurred to each employee of a production commencing on or 11    after May 1, 2006 and prior to July 1, 2022. For 12    productions commencing on or after July 1, 2022, limited 13    to the first $500,000 of wages paid or incurred to each 14    eligible nonresident or resident employee of a production 15    company or loan out company that provides in-State 16    services to a production, whether those wages are paid or 17    incurred by the production company, loan out company, or 18    both, subject to withholding payments provided for in 19    Article 7 of the Illinois Income Tax Act. For purposes of 20    calculating Illinois labor expenditures for a television 21    series, the eligible nonresident wage limitations provided 22    under this subparagraph are applied to the entire season. 23    For the purpose of this paragraph (5), an eligible 24    nonresident is a nonresident whose wages qualify as an 25    Illinois labor expenditure under the provisions of 26    paragraph (9) that apply to that production.   HB1424- 7 -LRB104 05872 HLH 15903 b1        (6) For a production commencing before May 1, 2006, 2    exclusive of the salary or wages paid to or incurred for 3    the 2 highest paid employees of the production.4        (7) Directly attributable to the accredited 5    production. 6        (8) (Blank). 7        (9) Prior to July 1, 2022, paid to persons resident in 8    Illinois at the time the payments were made. For a 9    production commencing on or after July 1, 2022, paid to 10    persons resident in Illinois and nonresidents at the time 11    the payments were made. 12        For purposes of this subparagraph, if the production 13    is accredited by the Department before the effective date 14    of this amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly, only 15    wages paid to nonresidents working in the following 16    positions shall be considered Illinois labor expenditures: 17    Writer, Director, Director of Photography, Production 18    Designer, Costume Designer, Production Accountant, VFX 19    Supervisor, Editor, Composer, and Actor, subject to the 20    limitations set forth under this subparagraph. For an 21    accredited Illinois production spending of $25,000,000 or 22    less, no more than 2 nonresident actors' wages shall 23    qualify as an Illinois labor expenditure. For an 24    accredited production with Illinois production spending of 25    more than $25,000,000, no more than 4 nonresident actor's 26    wages shall qualify as Illinois labor expenditures.   HB1424- 8 -LRB104 05872 HLH 15903 b1        For purposes of this subparagraph, if the production 2    is accredited by the Department on or after the effective 3    date of this amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly, 4    wages paid to nonresidents shall qualify as Illinois labor 5    expenditures only under the following conditions:6            (A) the nonresident must be employed in a 7        qualified position;8            (B) for each of those accredited productions, the 9        wages of not more than 9 nonresidents who are employed 10        in a qualified position other than Actor shall qualify 11        as Illinois labor expenditures;12            (C) for an accredited production with Illinois 13        production spending of $25,000,000 or less, no more 14        than 2 nonresident actors' wages shall qualify as 15        Illinois labor expenditures; and 16            (D) for an accredited production with Illinois 17        production spending of more than $25,000,000, no more 18        than 4 nonresident actors' wages shall qualify as 19        Illinois labor expenditures. 20        As used in this paragraph (9), "qualified position" 21    means: Writer, Director, Director of Photography, 22    Production Designer, Costume Designer, Production 23    Accountant, VFX Supervisor, Editor, Composer, or Actor. 24        (10) Paid for services rendered in Illinois. 25    "Illinois production spending" means the expenses incurred 26by the applicant for an accredited production, but does not   HB1424- 9 -LRB104 05872 HLH 15903 b1include any monetary prize or the cost of any non-monetary 2prize awarded pursuant to a production in respect of a game, 3questionnaire, or contest. "Illinois production spending" 4includes, without limitation, all of the following:5        (1) expenses to purchase, from vendors within 6    Illinois, tangible personal property that is used in the 7    accredited production;8        (2) expenses to acquire services, from vendors in 9    Illinois, for film production, editing, or processing; and10        (3) for a production commencing before July 1, 2022, 11    the compensation, not to exceed $100,000 for any one 12    employee, for contractual or salaried employees who are 13    Illinois residents performing services with respect to the 14    accredited production. For a production commencing on or 15    after July 1, 2022, the compensation, not to exceed 16    $500,000 for any one employee, for contractual or salaried 17    employees who are Illinois residents or nonresident 18    employees, subject to the limitations set forth under 19    Section 10 of this Act. 20    "Loan out company" means a personal service corporation or 21other entity that is under contract with the taxpayer to 22provide specified individual personnel, such as artists, crew, 23actors, producers, or directors for the performance of 24services used directly in a production. "Loan out company" 25does not include entities contracted with by the taxpayer to 26provide goods or ancillary contractor services such as   HB1424- 10 -LRB104 05872 HLH 15903 b1catering, construction, trailers, equipment, or 2transportation. 3    "Qualified production facility" means stage facilities in 4the State in which television shows and films are or are 5intended to be regularly produced and that contain at least 6one sound stage of at least 15,000 square feet.7    "STEM-related field" means a profession or occupation that 8requires skill or training in science, technology, 9engineering, mathematics, or any combination of those 10disciplines. 11    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1006, if 12any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 13with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 14Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 15Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 16whatever reason, is unauthorized. 17(Source: P.A. 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-700, eff. 4-19-22; 18102-1125, eff. 2-3-23; 103-595, eff. 6-26-24.)